Massachusetts, session 194th, H2791.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 432 of the Acts of 2022 is hereby amended by striking
out subsection (c).
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 433 of the Acts of 2022 is hereby amended by striking
out subsection (c).
of 1